Utah statutes.
22-7-117.   Application.

This chapter applies to every trust or decedent's estate existing on July 1, 2013, or created afterward, except as otherwise expressly provided in the will or terms of the trust or in this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 244, 2013 General Session

